Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.410

Organization—Effect on ordinances—Boundaries—Property.

All bylaws, ordinances and resolutions in force when a city organizes under the commission form shall remain in force until amended or repealed.

The boundaries of a city reorganized under the commission form shall not be changed thereby.

All rights and property vested in the city before reorganization under the commission form shall vest in the city as reorganized and no right or liability either in favor of or against it, existing at the time and no suit or prosecution shall be affected by the change.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.410. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 4, part; RRS s 9093, part.]